extensions/331662_correutor_asturianu/correutor_asturianu-2.70/dictionaries/ast.aff
FLAG long
SFX Va adir áden/XxV1V2 adir
SFX Va adir adi/Ll adir
SFX Va adir ádi/XxV1V2 adir
SFX Va aldir áldes/XxV7V8 aldir
SFX Va aldir álde/XxV1V2 aldir
SFX Va aldir álden/XxV1V2 aldir
SFX Va aldir aldi/Ll aldir
SFX Va aldir áldi/XxV1V2 aldir
SFX Va aldrir áldres/XxV7V8 aldrir
SFX Va aldrir áldre/XxV1V2 aldrir
SFX Va aldrir áldren/XxV1V2 aldrir
SFX Va aldrir aldri/Ll aldrir
SFX Va aldrir áldri/XxV1V2 aldrir
SFX Va alir áles/XxV7V8 alir
SFX Va alir ál/XxV2 alir
SFX Va alir álen/XxV1V2 alir
SFX Va altrir áltres/XxV7V8 altrir
SFX Va altrir áltre/XxV1V2 altrir
SFX Va altrir áltren/XxV1V2 altrir
SFX Va altrir altri/Ll altrir
SFX Va altrir áltri/XxV1V2 altrir
SFX Va amir ámes/XxV7V8 amir
SFX Va amir áme/XxV1V2 amir
SFX Va amir ámen/XxV1V2 amir
SFX Va amir ami/Ll amir
SFX Va amir ámi/XxV1V2 amir
SFX Va ancir ánces/XxV7V8 ancir
SFX Va ancir ánce/XxV1V2 ancir
SFX Va ancir áncen/XxV1V2 ancir
SFX Va ancir anci/Ll ancir
SFX Va ancir ánci/XxV1V2 ancir
SFX Va andir ándes/XxV7V8 andir
SFX Va andir ánde/XxV1V2 andir
SFX Va andir ánden/XxV1V2 andir
SFX Va andir andi/Ll andir
SFX Va andir ándi/XxV1V2 andir
SFX Va anguir ángues/XxV7V8 anguir
SFX Va anguir ángue/XxV1V2 anguir
SFX Va anguir ánguen/XxV1V2 anguir
SFX Va anguir angui/Ll anguir
SFX Va anguir ángui/XxV1V2 anguir
SFX Va ansir ánses/XxV7V8 ansir
SFX Va ansir ánse/XxV1V2 ansir
SFX Va ansir ánsen/XxV1V2 ansir
SFX Va ansir ansi/Ll ansir
SFX Va ansir ánsi/XxV1V2 ansir
SFX Va anxir ánxes/XxV7V8 anxir
SFX Va anxir ánxe/XxV1V2 anxir
SFX Va anxir ánxen/XxV1V2 anxir
SFX Va anxir anxi/Ll anxir
SFX Va anxir ánxi/XxV1V2 anxir
SFX Va ardir árdes/XxV7V8 ardir
SFX Va ardir árde/XxV1V2 ardir
SFX Va ardir árden/XxV1V2 ardir
SFX Va ardir ardi/Ll ardir
SFX Va ardir árdi/XxV1V2 ardir
SFX Va argüir árgües/XxV7V8 argüir
SFX Va argüir árgüe/XxV1V2 argüir
SFX Va argüir árgüen/XxV1V2 argüir
SFX Va argüir argüi/Ll argüir
SFX Va argüir árgüi/XxV1V2 argüir
SFX Va arir áres/XxV7V8 arir
SFX Va arir áre/XxV1V2 arir
SFX Va arir áren/XxV1V2 arir
SFX Va arir ari/Ll arir
SFX Va arir ári/XxV1V2 arir
SFX Va arnir árnes/XxV7V8 arnir
SFX Va arnir árne/XxV1V2 arnir
SFX Va arnir árnen/XxV1V2 arnir
SFX Va arnir arni/Ll arnir
SFX Va arnir árni/XxV1V2 arnir
SFX Va arpir árpes/XxV7V8 arpir
SFX Va arpir árpe/XxV1V2 arpir
SFX Va arpir árpen/XxV1V2 arpir
SFX Va arpir arpi/Ll arpir
SFX Va arpir árpi/XxV1V2 arpir
SFX Va artir ártes/XxV7V8 artir
SFX Va artir árte/XxV1V2 artir
SFX Va artir árten/XxV1V2 artir
SFX Va artir arti/Ll artir
SFX Va artir árti/XxV1V2 artir
SFX Va aspir áspes/XxV7V8 aspir
SFX Va aspir áspe/XxV1V2 aspir
SFX Va aspir áspen/XxV1V2 aspir
SFX Va aspir aspi/Ll aspir
SFX Va aspir áspi/XxV1V2 aspir
SFX Va astir ástes/XxV7V8 astir
SFX Va astir áste/XxV1V2 astir
SFX Va astir ásten/XxV1V2 astir
SFX Va astir asti/Ll astir
SFX Va astir ásti/XxV1V2 astir
SFX Va atir átes/XxV7V8 atir
SFX Va atir áte/XxV1V2 atir
SFX Va atir áten/XxV1V2 atir
SFX Va atir ati/Ll atir
SFX Va atir áti/XxV1V2 atir
SFX Va atuir átues/XxV7V8 atuir
SFX Va atuir átue/XxV1V2 atuir
SFX Va atuir átuen/XxV1V2 atuir
SFX Va atuir atui/Ll atuir
SFX Va atuir átui/XxV1V2 atuir
SFX Va audir áudes/XxV7V8 audir
SFX Va audir áude/XxV1V2 audir
SFX Va audir áuden/XxV1V2 audir
SFX Va audir audi/Ll audir
SFX Va audir áudi/XxV1V2 audir
SFX Va aunir áunes/XxV7V8 aunir
SFX Va aunir áune/XxV1V2 aunir
SFX Va aunir áunen/XxV1V2 aunir
SFX Va aunir auni/Ll aunir
SFX Va aunir áuni/XxV1V2 aunir
SFX Va aznir áznes/XxV7V8 aznir
SFX Va aznir ázne/XxV1V2 aznir
SFX Va aznir áznen/XxV1V2 aznir
SFX Va aznir azni/Ll aznir
SFX Va aznir ázni/XxV1V2 aznir
SFX Va añir áñes/XxV7V8 añir
SFX Va añir áñe/XxV1V2 añir
SFX Va añir áñen/XxV1V2 añir
SFX Va añir añi/Ll añir
SFX Va añir áñi/XxV1V2 añir
SFX Va ebir ébes/XxV7V8 ebir
SFX Va ebir ébe/XxV1V2 ebir
SFX Va ebir ében/XxV1V2 ebir
SFX Va ebir ebi/Ll ebir
SFX Va ebir ébi/XxV1V2 ebir
SFX Va ecir éces/XxV7V8 ecir
SFX Va ecir éz/XxV2 ecir
SFX Va ecir écen/XxV1V2 ecir
SFX Va edir édes/XxV7V8 edir
SFX Va edir éde/XxV1V2 edir
SFX Va edir éden/XxV1V2 edir
SFX Va edir edi/Ll edir
SFX Va edir édi/XxV1V2 edir
SFX Va egrir égres/XxV7V8 egrir
SFX Va egrir égre/XxV1V2 egrir
SFX Va egrir égren/XxV1V2 egrir
SFX Va egrir egri/Ll egrir
SFX Va egrir égri/XxV1V2 egrir
SFX Va embir émbes/XxV7V8 embir
SFX Va embir émbe/XxV1V2 embir
SFX Va embir émben/XxV1V2 embir
SFX Va embir embi/Ll embir
SFX Va embir émbi/XxV1V2 embir
SFX Va emir émes/XxV7V8 emir
SFX Va emir éme/XxV1V2 emir
SFX Va emir émen/XxV1V2 emir
SFX Va emir emi/Ll emir
SFX Va emir émi/XxV1V2 emir
SFX Va engrir éngres/XxV7V8 engrir
SFX Va engrir éngre/XxV1V2 engrir
SFX Va engrir éngren/XxV1V2 engrir
SFX Va engrir engri/Ll engrir
SFX Va engrir éngri/XxV1V2 engrir
SFX Va entir éntes/XxV7V8 entir
SFX Va entir énte/XxV1V2 entir
SFX Va entir énten/XxV1V2 entir
SFX Va entir enti/Ll entir
SFX Va entir énti/XxV1V2 entir
SFX Va equir éques/XxV7V8 equir
SFX Va equir éque/XxV1V2 equir
SFX Va equir équen/XxV1V2 equir
SFX Va equir equi/Ll equir
SFX Va equir équi/XxV1V2 equir
SFX Va erir éres/XxV7V8 erir
SFX Va erir ere/XxV1V2 erir
SFX Va erir éren/XxV1V2 erir
SFX Va erir eri/Ll erir
SFX Va erir éri/XxV1V2 erir
SFX Va ernir érnes/XxV7V8 ernir
SFX Va ernir érne/XxV1V2 ernir
SFX Va ernir érnen/XxV1V2 ernir
SFX Va ernir erni/Ll ernir
SFX Va ernir érni/XxV1V2 ernir
SFX Va ertir értes/XxV7V8 ertir
SFX Va ertir érte/XxV1V2 ertir
SFX Va ertir érten/XxV1V2 ertir
SFX Va ertir erti/Ll ertir
SFX Va ertir érti/XxV1V2 ertir
SFX Va eslir ésles/XxV7V8 eslir
SFX Va eslir ésle/XxV1V2 eslir
SFX Va eslir éslen/XxV1V2 eslir
SFX Va eslir esli/Ll eslir
SFX Va eslir ésli/XxV1V2 eslir
SFX Va esllir éslles/XxV7V8 esllir
SFX Va esllir éslle/XxV1V2 esllir
SFX Va esllir ésllen/XxV1V2 esllir
SFX Va esllir eslli/Ll esllir
SFX Va esllir éslli/XxV1V2 esllir
SFX Va etir étes/XxV7V8 etir
SFX Va etir éte/XxV1V2 etir
SFX Va etir éten/XxV1V2 etir
SFX Va etir eti/Ll etir
SFX Va etir éti/XxV1V2 etir
SFX Va evir éves/XxV7V8 evir
SFX Va evir éve/XxV1V2 evir
SFX Va evir éven/XxV1V2 evir
SFX Va evir evi/Ll evir
SFX Va evir évi/XxV1V2 evir
SFX Va ibir íbes/XxV7V8 ibir
SFX Va ibir íbe/XxV1V2 ibir
SFX Va ibir íben/XxV1V2 ibir
SFX Va ibir ibi/Ll ibir
SFX Va ibir íbi/XxV1V2 ibir
SFX Va icir íces/XxV7V8 icir
SFX Va icir íz/XxV2 icir
SFX Va icir ícen/XxV1V2 icir
SFX Va icir í/V1V2 icir
SFX Va idir ídes/XxV7V8 idir
SFX Va idir íde/XxV1V2 idir
SFX Va idir íden/XxV1V2 idir
SFX Va idir idi/Ll idir
SFX Va idir ídi/XxV1V2 idir
SFX Va iguir ígues/XxV7V8 iguir
SFX Va iguir ígue/XxV1V2 iguir
SFX Va iguir íguen/XxV1V2 iguir
SFX Va iguir igui/Ll iguir
SFX Va iguir ígui/XxV1V2 iguir
SFX Va ildir íldes/XxV7V8 ildir
SFX Va ildir ílde/XxV1V2 ildir
SFX Va ildir ílden/XxV1V2 ildir
SFX Va ildir ildi/Ll ildir
SFX Va ildir íldi/XxV1V2 ildir
SFX Va ilir íles/XxV7V8 ilir
SFX Va ilir íle/XxV1V2 ilir
SFX Va ilir ílen/XxV1V2 ilir
SFX Va ilir ili/Ll ilir
SFX Va ilir íli/XxV1V2 ilir
SFX Va illir ílles/XxV7V8 illir
SFX Va illir ílle/XxV1V2 illir
SFX Va illir íllen/XxV1V2 illir
SFX Va illir illi/Ll illir
SFX Va illir ílli/XxV1V2 illir
SFX Va imbir ímbes/XxV7V8 imbir
SFX Va imbir ímbe/XxV1V2 imbir
SFX Va imbir ímben/XxV1V2 imbir
SFX Va imbir imbi/Ll imbir
SFX Va imbir ímbi/XxV1V2 imbir
SFX Va imblir ímbles/XxV7V8 imblir
SFX Va imblir ímble/XxV1V2 imblir
SFX Va imblir ímblen/XxV1V2 imblir
SFX Va imblir imbli/Ll imblir
SFX Va imblir ímbli/XxV1V2 imblir
SFX Va imir ímes/XxV7V8 imir
SFX Va imir íme/XxV1V2 imir
SFX Va imir ímen/XxV1V2 imir
SFX Va imir imi/Ll imir
SFX Va imir ími/XxV1V2 imir
SFX Va inchir ínches/XxV7V8 inchir
SFX Va inchir ínche/XxV1V2 inchir
SFX Va inchir ínchen/XxV1V2 inchir
SFX Va inchir inchi/Ll inchir
SFX Va inchir ínchi/XxV1V2 inchir
SFX Va incir ínces/XxV7V8 incir
SFX Va incir ínce/XxV1V2 incir
SFX Va incir íncen/XxV1V2 incir
SFX Va incir inci/Ll incir
SFX Va incir ínci/XxV1V2 incir
SFX Va indir índes/XxV7V8 indir
SFX Va indir índe/XxV1V2 indir
SFX Va indir índen/XxV1V2 indir
SFX Va indir indi/Ll indir
SFX Va indir índi/XxV1V2 indir
SFX Va inguir íngues/XxV7V8 inguir
SFX Va inguir íngue/XxV1V2 inguir
