extensions/331662_correutor_asturianu/correutor_asturianu-2.70/dictionaries/ast.dic
ablagar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
abundar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
acarondiar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
achochecer/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
acoplerar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
acuñar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
afallecer/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
afollicar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
agarabañar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
agulgar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
alfombrar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
allozar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
amañar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
amerriar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
amostecer/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
anguñar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
apabiar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
apatuscar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
apezonar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
apodrigañar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
apulgarar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
arquexar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
arrebucir/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
arrescuñar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
artar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
asonsar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
atarranchar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
atonicar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
atrometer/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
avexigar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
azolicar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
barbuyir/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
blincar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
burriar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
callar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
carburar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
cazamurar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
charcoletiar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
churruscar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
cocicar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
comuñar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
contradicir/VaVkVpVrVt
cosigañar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
curuxar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
demer/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desacomuñar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desamar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desarreglar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
descartar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desembridar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desenfocar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desenvasar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desmeyorar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
destituyir/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
diseicionar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
embabucar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
embogar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
empalomar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
empeorar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
empuchar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
encantar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
encernadar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
encorriar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
enfadar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
engalanar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
engorollar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
enllapiñar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
enraxar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
ensugar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
entiznar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
entrometer/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
enxirir/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esbandayar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esborricar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
escagarriar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
escañolar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
escarreñar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
escobiyar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
escostrar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
escurir/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esfocicar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esgañar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esguandiar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esmaltar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esmontar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
espadar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
espatexar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
espetonar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esportar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
estampanar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
estomagar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
estrobanar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
eszaballar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
fartar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
flocar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
frayar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
galvanizar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
golipar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
guilfar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
imprentar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
interrumpir/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
llancir/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
llocalizar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
malfaer/VaVkVpVrVt
marmolecer/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
mesar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
mosquerar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
naxar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
ñiciar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
padriar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
parvolecer/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
perfumar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
pipar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
preceder/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
prostituyir/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
radicar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
reaicionar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
rechistar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
referise/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
remanar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
repicar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
resoplar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
revalorizar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
robexar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
salabiar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
serruchar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
sogatiar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
sorrisar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
sustantivar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
tartaxear/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
tiranizar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
trafulgar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
tresllumar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
tumbiar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
xaciar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
zaramiellar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
